Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1806
Consultation, defined.

Consultation means conferring with a physician, nurse practitioner, or physician assistant regarding the provision of medical nutrition therapy. In the inpatient setting, consultation may be satisfied by practicing under clinical privileges or following facility-established protocols. In the outpatient setting, consultation may be satisfied by conferring with a consulting physician or the referring primary care practitioner or physician of the patient.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 628;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 28.